Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 11. Deposit Accounts.

§ 6.2-893.
Payment of balance of deceased person or person under disability.

Any bank may pay any balance on deposit to the credit of any deceased person or of any person under disability, to the personal representative, curator, conservator, or committee of such person upon a letter of qualification as such personal representative, curator, conservator or committee, issued by an appropriate court. The letter shall be sufficient authority for such transfer. Any such bank making such transfer shall no longer be liable for such deposit to any person. The presentation of a duly certified letter of qualification as personal representative, curator, conservator, or committee shall be conclusive proof of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the same. Payment to a fiduciary qualified under the law of a state other than the Commonwealth shall be in accordance with Article 2 (§

64.2-1426

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 64.2 and §

64.2-609

.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-53; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-70; 1983, c. 487; 1997, c. 801; 2010, c. 794.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the reference to “Chapter 5 (§ 26-59 et seq.) of Title 26 and § 64.1-130” was changed to “Article 2 (§

64.2-1426

et seq.) of Chapter 14 of Title 64.2 and §

64.2-609

” to conform to the recodification of Title 26 by Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-401 Checklist for Probate and Administration; No. 15-441 Certificate/Letter of Qualification; No. 15-451 Affidavit Under Virginia Small Estate Act.

§ 6.2-894.
Deposits in and withdrawals from accounts of convicts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 11 (§

53.1-221

et seq.) of Title 53.1, a person convicted of a felony and sentenced to confinement in a state correctional institution for one year or longer, with the written consent of the Director of the Department of Corrections, may have a bank account, free from control of all persons except the Director of the Department of Corrections and a committee appointed pursuant to the provisions of §

53.1-221

. A deposit made in a bank account by a convict shall be held for the exclusive right and benefit of the convict. The check, order, or receipt of the convict shall be a complete and sufficient release and discharge for any payments made from the deposit in the bank, until the bank is notified in writing by a duly qualified committee or the Director of the Department of Corrections not to permit further withdrawals from that account.

Upon receipt of such written notice or commencing on the banking day following the date of receipt of such written notice, the bank shall not permit further withdrawal, except with the consent of the committee or the Director of the Department of Corrections. A bank may further accept, pay or collect items on account for proceeds of collection of a bank account of a convict, despite his conviction or confinement or the bank’s knowledge thereof, until it receives written directions to the contrary from the committee of such convict or the Director of the Department of Corrections.

History.

1982, c. 593, § 6.1-70.1; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-895.
Repealed by Acts 2010, c. 269, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 269 repealed former § 6.1-71, from which §

6.2-895

as enacted by Acts 2010, c. 794, was derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 4, the 2010 repeal by c. 269 has been given effect in this section.

Former § 6.1-71, relating to payment of small balance to distributees or other persons, was derived from Code 1950, § 6-54; 1956, c. 423; 1962, c. 173; 1966, c. 584; 1968, c. 379; 1972, c. 191; 1976, c. 228; 1980, c. 462; 1986, c. 334; 1994, c. 7; 1997, c. 278; 2002, cc. 187, 220, 227.

§ 6.2-896.
Deposits of minors.

A bank may establish a deposit account for a minor as the sole and absolute owner of such account. The bank may receive deposits by or for such minor, honor any withdrawal request of the minor, and act in any other manner with respect to such account on the minor’s order. Any payment or delivery of funds from such account to the minor, or the payment of a check or other written order for withdrawal of funds signed by such minor owner, shall be a valid and sufficient release and discharge of such bank for any payment or delivery so made. The parent or guardian of such minor shall not in his capacity as parent or guardian have the power to withdraw or transfer funds in any such account unless the minor has given written notice to the bank to accept the signature of such parent or guardian.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-56; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-74; 2009, c. 197; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-897.
Bank need not inquire as to fiduciary funds deposited in fiduciary’s personal account.

If any fiduciary or agent makes a deposit in a bank to his personal credit of checks drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary, or of checks drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal, if he is empowered to draw checks thereon, or of checks payable to his principal and endorsed by him as fiduciary, the bank receiving the deposit:

Shall not be required to inquire whether the fiduciary is committing thereby a breach of his obligation as fiduciary; and

Is authorized to pay the amount of the deposit or any part thereof upon the withdrawal by the fiduciary without being liable to the principal, unless the bank receives the deposit or pays the withdrawal with (i) actual knowledge that the fiduciary, in making such deposit or in making such withdrawal, is committing a breach of his obligation as fiduciary or (ii) knowledge of such facts that its action in receiving the deposit or paying the check amounts to bad faith.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-57; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-75; 2010, c. 794.